Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-302 Commissioner refusal to
authorize certificate or solicitation; appeal to circuit court. (a) If
the commissioner reasonably believes that the financial plan of the society is
unsound or not feasible from an actuarial or other accounting standpoint, the
commissioner shall refuse to issue a certificate, authorize the society to
solicit members, or engage in business.

(b) Any person aggrieved by the decision of
the commissioner refusing to issue the certificate, or to authorize the society
to solicit members, or to engage in business, may within twenty days after the
decision appeal to the circuit court of the circuit in which the society
proposes to have its principal place of business. The procedure upon appeal
shall be the same as in the case of other appeals to the circuit court in civil
cases. The court shall hear the appeal without a jury. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next